Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 3 Certification of Seeds and Plants

2-11-50.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly declares that for the purpose of fostering improved agricultural methods, promoting advances in agricultural fields, and giving legal status to an existing practice and for the general welfare of the people it is necessary to establish as a policy of this state a method for protecting the public in the guarantee of the high quality of seeds and plants for various agricultural pursuits. It is the intent of the General Assembly to carry out that policy by this article, protecting the public from false claims and unwarranted statements as to genetic identity, varietal purity, and germinating viability of seeds and plants presented and claimed to be foundation, registered, or certified.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 16, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 2.

2-11-51.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the term:

“Certified seed” means the progeny of foundation, registered, or in special cases certified seed which meets the standards of the official seed certifying agency.

“Foundation seed” means the progeny of breeder’s seed or in special cases the progeny of foundation seed which meets the standards of the official seed certifying agency.

“Plant” means seedlings, nursery stock, roots, tubers, bulbs, cuttings, and other parts used in the propagation of field crops, vegetables, fruits, flowers, trees, or other plants.

“Registered seed” means the progeny of foundation seed and meets the standards of the official seed certifying agency.

“Seed” means the true seeds of all field crops, vegetables, flowers, trees, or other plants.

“Variety” carries its original meaning and includes “strains” of varieties which are sufficiently different from the parent variety to justify special designation.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 16, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 2.

2-11-52.
Designation of agency for certification of seeds and plants; liability for damages resulting from certification work; immunity.

In order to execute the policy stated in Code Section 2-11-50, the dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia is authorized to provide for seed, plant, and variety certification and labeling. The dean shall designate a certifying agency, provided that such designee must be in good standing with the Association of Official Seed Certifying Agencies. The College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia shall not be held responsible for any claim, debt, obligation, or damage of any kind to any person in conducting certification work or in the work of the certifying agent. The certifying agency so designated by the dean shall, along with its employees, be immune from liability to the same extent as the state and state officers and employees under Article 2 of Chapter 21 of Title 50, “The Georgia Tort Claims Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 16, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1129, § 1/SB 390.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

2-11-53.
False use of evidence of certification in sale of seeds or plants.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person, firm, association, or corporation selling seeds or plants in this state to use any evidence of certification, including specially designed tags or any tags similar thereto or the word “certified,” on any package of seeds or plants, unless such seeds or plants have been duly inspected and certified as provided for in this article or have been inspected and certified by a legally constituted agency of another state or foreign country. The duty of enforcing this Code section shall be vested in the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 16, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1151, § 2.